Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,157
Foreign corporation; grounds for revocation of certificate of authority.

(a) The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under section 21-19,158 to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state if:

(1) The foreign corporation does not deliver the biennial report to the Secretary of State when it is due;

(2) The foreign corporation does not pay any fees, taxes, or penalties imposed by the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act or other law when they are due;

(3) The foreign corporation is without a registered agent or registered office in this state for sixty days or more;

(4) The foreign corporation does not inform the Secretary of State under section 21-19,153 or 21-19,154 that its registered agent or registered office has changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or that its registered office has been discontinued within ninety days after the change, resignation, or discontinuance;

(5) An incorporator, director, officer, or agent of the foreign corporation signed a document such person knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing; or

(6) The Secretary of State receives a duly authenticated certificate from the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the foreign corporation is incorporated stating that it has been dissolved or has disappeared as the result of a merger.

(b) The Attorney General may commence a proceeding under section 21-19,158 to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state if:

(1) The corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

(2) The corporation would have been a public benefit corporation had it been incorporated in this state and that its corporate assets in this state are being misapplied or wasted; or

(3) The corporation would have been a public benefit corporation had it been incorporated in this state and it is no longer able to carry out its purposes.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 157.